Utah statutes.
53-6-210.   Investigations and certification hearings -- Powers of division -- Violation.

(1)  For investigations by the division and for certification hearings or other testimony before the council, the division may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, take evidence, and require by subpoena duces tecum the production of relevant papers, records, or other documents or information, whether filed or kept in original form, or electronically stored or recorded.

(2)  A person who willfully disobeys a properly served subpoena issued by the division is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

